California statutes. Labor Code
(5) A position that involves regular access, for any purpose other than the routine solicitation and processing of credit card applications in a retail establishment, to all of the following types of information of any one person:

(A) Bank or credit card account information.

(B) Social security number.

(C) Date of birth.

(6) A position in which the person is, or would be, any of the following:

(A) A named signatory on the bank or credit card account of the employer.

(B) Authorized to transfer money on behalf of the employer.

(C) Authorized to enter
 into financial contracts on behalf of the employer.

(7) A position that involves access to confidential or proprietary information, including a formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, process or trade secret that (i) derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by, other persons who may obtain economic value from the disclosure or use of the information, and (ii) is the subject of an effort that is reasonable under the circumstances to maintain secrecy of the information.

(8) A position that involves regular access to cash totaling ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more of the employer, a customer, or client, during the workday.

(b) This section does not apply to a person or business subject
 to Sections 6801 to 6809, inclusive, of Title 15 of the United States Code and state and federal statutes or regulations implementing those sections if the person or business is subject to compliance oversight by a state or federal regulatory agency with respect to those laws. 

(c) The following definitions apply to this section:

(1) “Consumer credit report” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1785.3 of the Civil Code, but does not include a report that (A) verifies income or employment, and (B) does not include credit-related information, such as credit history, credit score, or credit record.

(2) “Managerial position” means an employee covered by the executive exemption set forth in subparagraph (1) of paragraph (A) of Section 1 of Wage Order 4 of the
 Industrial Welfare Commission (8 Cal. Code Regs. 11040).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 724, Sec. 2.   (AB 22)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1024.6.

An employer may not discharge an employee or in any manner discriminate, retaliate, or take any adverse action against an employee because the employee updates or attempts to update his or her personal information based on a lawful change of name, social security number, or federal employment authorization document. An employer’s compliance with this section shall not serve as the basis for a claim of discrimination, including any disparate treatment claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 79, Sec. 3.   (AB 2751)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.7. Alcohol and Drug Rehabilitation [1025. - 1028.]

1025.

Every private employer regularly employing 25 or more employees shall reasonably accommodate any employee who wishes to voluntarily enter and participate in an alcohol or drug rehabilitation program, provided that this reasonable accommodation does not impose an undue hardship on the employer.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit an employer from refusing to hire, or discharging an employee who, because of the employee’s current use of alcohol or drugs, is unable to perform his or her duties, or cannot perform the duties in a manner which would not endanger his or her health or safety or the health or safety of others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 506, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1026.

The employer shall make reasonable efforts to safeguard the privacy of the employee as to the fact that he or she has enrolled in an alcohol or drug rehabilitation program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 506, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1027.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an employer to provide time off with pay, except that an employee may use sick leave to which he or she is entitled for the purpose of entering and participating in an alcohol or drug rehabilitation program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 506, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1028.

An employee may file a complaint with the Labor Commissioner if he or she believes that he or she has been denied reasonable accommodation as required by this chapter. Sections 98, 98.1, 98.2, 98.3, 98.4, 98.5, 98.6, and 98.7 shall be applicable to a complaint filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1103, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.8. Lactation Accommodation [1030. - 1034.]

1030.

Every employer, including the state and any political subdivision, shall provide a reasonable amount of break time to accommodate an employee desiring to express breast milk for the employee’s infant child each time the employee has need to express milk. The break time shall, if possible, run concurrently with any break time already provided to the employee. Break time for an employee that does not run concurrently with the rest time authorized for the employee by the applicable wage order of the Industrial Welfare Commission shall be unpaid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   (SB 142)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1031.

(a) An employer shall provide an employee with the use of a room or other location for the employee to express milk in private. The room or location may include the place where the employee normally works if it otherwise meets the requirements of this section.

(b) A lactation room or location shall not be a bathroom and shall be in close proximity to the employee’s work area, shielded from view, and free from intrusion while the employee is expressing milk.

(c) A lactation room or location shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Be safe, clean, and free of hazardous materials, as defined in Section 6382.

(2) Contain a surface to place a breast pump and personal items.

(3) Contain a place to sit.

(4) Have access to electricity or alternative devices, including, but not limited to, extension cords or charging stations, needed to operate an electric or battery-powered breast pump.

(d) The employer shall provide access to a sink with running water and a refrigerator suitable for storing milk in close proximity to the employee’s
 workspace. If a refrigerator cannot be provided, an employer may provide another cooling device suitable for storing milk, such as an employer-provided cooler.

(e) Where a multipurpose room is used for lactation, among other uses, the use of the room for lactation shall take precedence over the other uses, but only for the time it is in use for lactation purposes.

(f) (1) An employer in a multitenant building or multiemployer worksite may comply with this section by providing a space shared among multiple employers within the building or worksite if the employer cannot provide a lactation location within the employer’s own workspace.

(2) Employers or general contractors coordinating a multiemployer
 worksite shall either provide lactation accommodations or provide a safe and secure location for a subcontractor employer to provide lactation accommodations on the worksite, within two business days, upon written request of any subcontractor employer with an employee that requests an accommodation.

(g) An agricultural employer, as defined in Section 1140.4, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section if the agricultural employer provides an employee wanting to express milk with a private, enclosed, and shaded space, including, but not limited to, an air-conditioned cab of a truck or tractor.

(h) An employer may comply with this section by designating a lactation location that is temporary, due to operational, financial, or space limitations. These temporary spaces
 shall not be a bathroom and shall be in close proximity to the employee’s work area, shielded from view, free from intrusion while the employee is expressing milk, and otherwise compliant with this section.

(i) An employer that employs fewer than 50 employees may be exempt from a requirement of this section if it can demonstrate that a requirement would impose an undue hardship by causing
 the employer significant difficulty or expense when considered in relation to the size, financial resources, nature, or structure of the employer’s business. If that employer can demonstrate that the requirement to provide an employee with the use of a room or other location, other than a bathroom, would impose such undue hardship, the employer shall make reasonable efforts to provide the employee with the use of a room or other location, other than a toilet stall, in close proximity to the employee’s work area, for the employee to express milk in private.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 720, Sec. 2.   (SB 142)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1032.

An employer is not required to provide break time under this chapter if to do so would seriously disrupt the operations of the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 821, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1033.

(a) The denial of reasonable break time or adequate space to express milk in accordance with this chapter shall be deemed a failure to comply for purposes of Section 226.7. An aggrieved employee may file a complaint under this subdivision with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 98.

(b) An employer shall not discharge, or in any other manner discriminate or retaliate against, an employee for exercising or attempting to exercise any right protected under this chapter. This subdivision is not intended to limit or expand an employee’s rights pursuant to Section 98.6. An aggrieved employee may file a complaint under this subdivision with the Labor
 Commissioner pursuant to Section 98.7.

(c) An employee may report a violation of this chapter to the Labor Commissioner’s field enforcement unit. If, upon inspection or investigation, the Labor Commissioner determines that a violation of this chapter has occurred, the Labor Commissioner may issue a citation and may impose a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day that an employee is denied reasonable break time or adequate space to express milk in violation of this chapter. The procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations or civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner for violations of this chapter shall be the same as those set forth in Section 1197.1.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code,
 violations
 of this chapter shall not be misdemeanors under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 720, Sec. 3.   (SB 142)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1034.

(a) An employer shall develop and implement a policy regarding lactation accommodation that includes the following:

(1) A statement about an employee’s right to request lactation accommodation.

(2) The process by which the employee makes the request described in paragraph (1).

(3) An employer’s obligation to respond to the request described in paragraph (1) as outlined in subdivision (d).

(4) A statement about an employee’s right to file a complaint with the Labor Commissioner for any
 violation of a right under this chapter.

(b) The employer shall include the policy described in subdivision (a) in an employee handbook or set of policies that the employer makes available to employees.

(c) The employer shall distribute the policy described in subdivision (a) to new employees upon hiring and when an employee makes an inquiry about or requests parental leave.

(d) If an employer cannot provide break time or a location that complies with the policy described in subdivision (a), the employer shall provide a written response to the employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 720, Sec. 4.   (SB 142)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.9. Employee Literacy Assistance [1040. - 1044.]

1040.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Employee Literacy Education Assistance Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 339, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1041.

(a) Every private employer regularly employing 25 or more employees shall reasonably accommodate and assist any employee who reveals a problem of illiteracy and requests employer assistance in enrolling in an adult literacy education program, provided that this reasonable accommodation does not impose an undue hardship on the employer. 

(b) For purposes of this section, employer assistance includes, but is not limited to, providing the employee with the locations of local literacy education programs or arranging for a literacy education provider to visit the jobsite.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 339, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1042.

The employer shall make reasonable efforts to safeguard the privacy of the employee as to the fact that he or she has a problem with illiteracy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 339, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1043.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an employer to provide time off with pay for an employee to enroll and participate in an adult literacy education program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 339, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1044.

An employee who reveals a problem of illiteracy and who satisfactorily performs his or her work shall not be subject to termination of employment because of the disclosure of illiteracy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 339, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Reemployment Privileges [1050. - 1057.]

1050.

Any person, or agent or officer thereof, who, after having discharged an employee from the service of such person or after an employee has voluntarily left such service, by any misrepresentation prevents or attempts to prevent the former employee from obtaining employment, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 513, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.

Except as provided in Section 1057, any person or agent or officer thereof, who requires, as a condition precedent to securing or retaining employment, that an employee or applicant for employment be photographed or fingerprinted by any person who desires his or her photograph or fingerprints for the purpose of furnishing the same or information concerning the same or concerning the employee or applicant for employment to any other employer or third person, and these photographs and fingerprints could be used to the detriment of the employee or applicant for employment is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 77, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1052.

Any person who knowingly causes, suffers, or permits an agent, superintendent, manager, or employee in his employ to commit a violation of sections 1050 and 1051, or who fails to take all reasonable steps within his power to prevent such violation is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1053.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent an employer or an agent, employee, superintendent or manager thereof from furnishing, upon special request therefor, a truthful statement concerning the reason for the discharge of an employee or why an employee voluntarily left the service of the employer. If such statement furnishes any mark, sign, or other means conveying information different from that expressed by words therein, such fact, or the fact that such statement or other means of furnishing information was given without a special request therefor is prima facie evidence of a violation of sections 1050 to 1053.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.

In addition to and apart from the criminal penalty provided any person or agent or officer thereof, who violates any provision of sections 1050 to 1052, inclusive, is liable to the party aggrieved, in a civil action, for treble damages. Such civil action may be brought by such aggrieved person or his assigns, or successors in interest, without first establishing any criminal liability under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.

Every public utility corporation shall, upon request by any employee leaving its service, give to such employee a letter stating the period of service and the kind of service rendered to the public utility corporation by the employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1056.

Every public utility corporation violating Section 1055 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) for each offense, which fine shall be collected by the district attorney of the county in which the public utility corporation has its principal place of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 203.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.

Section 1051 shall not apply to any employee of a diversified or nondiversified management company, as defined in Section 80a-5 of Title 15 of the United States Code, and the affiliates thereof, as defined in Sections 80a-2(a)(2) and 80a-2(a)(3) of Title 15 of the United States Code, who is required to be fingerprinted pursuant to federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 77, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Displaced Janitor Opportunity Act [1060. - 1065.]

1060.

The following definitions shall apply throughout this chapter:

(a) “Awarding authority” means any person that awards or otherwise enters into contracts for janitorial or building maintenance services performed within the State of California, including any subcontracts for janitorial or building maintenance services.

(b) “Contractor” means any person that employs 25 or more individuals and that enters into a service contract with the awarding authority.

(c) “Employee” means any person employed as a service employee of a contractor or subcontractor who works at least 15 hours per week and whose primary place of employment is in the State of California under a contract to provide janitorial or building maintenance services. “Employee” does not include a person who is a managerial, supervisory, or confidential employee, including those employees who would be so defined under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act.

(d) “Person” means any individual, proprietorship, partnership, joint venture, corporation, limited liability company, trust, association, or other entity that may employ individuals or enter into contracts.

(e) “Service contract” means any contract that has the principal purpose of providing services through the use of service employees.

(f) “Subcontractor” means any person who is not an employee who enters into a contract with a contractor to assist the contractor in performing a service contract.

(g) “Successor service contract” means a service contract for the performance of essentially the same services as were previously performed pursuant to a different service contract at the same facility that terminated within the previous 30 days. A service contract entered into more than 30 days after the termination of a predecessor service contract shall be considered a “successor service contract” if its execution was delayed for the purpose of avoiding application of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1061.

(a) (1) If an awarding authority notifies a contractor that the service contract between the awarding authority and the contractor has been terminated or will be terminated, the awarding authority shall indicate in that notification whether a successor service contract has been or will be awarded in its place and, if so, shall identify the name and address of the successor contractor. The terminated contractor shall, within three working days after receiving that notification, provide to the successor contractor identified by the awarding authority, the name, date of hire, and job classification of each employee employed at the site or sites covered by the terminated service contract at the time of the contract termination.

(2) If the terminated contractor has not learned the identity of the successor contractor, if any, the terminated contractor shall provide that information to the awarding authority, which shall be responsible for providing that information to the successor contractor as soon as that contractor has been selected.

(3) The requirements of this section shall be equally applicable to all subcontractors of a terminated contractor.

(b) (1) A successor contractor or successor subcontractor shall retain, for a 60-day transition employment period, employees who have been employed by the terminated contractor or its subcontractors, if any, for the preceding four months or longer at the site or sites covered by the successor service contract unless the successor contractor or successor subcontractor has reasonable and substantiated cause not to hire a particular employee based on that employee’s performance or conduct while working under the terminated contract. This requirement shall be stated by awarding authorities in all initial bid packages that are governed by this chapter.

(2) The successor contractor or successor subcontractor shall make a written offer of employment to each employee, as required by this section, in the employee’s primary language or another language in which the employee is literate. That offer shall state the time within which the employee must accept that offer, but in no case may that time be less than 10 days. Nothing in this section requires the successor contractor or successor subcontractor to pay the same wages or offer the same benefits as were provided by the prior contractor or prior subcontractor.

(3) If at any time the successor contractor or successor subcontractor determines that fewer employees are needed to perform services under the successor service contract or successor subcontract than were required by the terminated contractor under the terminated contract or terminated subcontract, the successor contractor or successor subcontractor shall retain employees by seniority within the job classification.

(c) The successor contractor or successor subcontractor, upon commencing service under the successor service contract, shall provide a list of its employees and a list of employees of its subcontractors providing services at the site or sites covered under that contract to the awarding authority. These lists shall indicate which of these employees were employed at the site or sites by the terminated contractor or terminated subcontractor. The successor contractor or successor subcontractor shall also provide a list of any of the terminated contractor’s employees who were not retained either by the successor contractor or successor subcontractor, stating the reason these employees were not retained.

(d) During the 60-day transition employment period, the successor contractor or successor subcontractor shall maintain a preferential hiring list of eligible covered employees not retained by the successor contractor or successor subcontractor from which the successor contractor or successor subcontractor shall hire additional employees until such time as all of the terminated contractor’s or terminated subcontractor’s employees have been offered employment with the successor contractor or successor subcontractor.

(e) During the initial 60-day transition employment period, the successor contractor or successor subcontractor shall not discharge without cause an employee retained pursuant to this chapter. Cause shall be based only on the performance or conduct of the particular employee.

(f) At the end of the 60-day transition employment period, a successor contractor or successor subcontractor shall provide a written performance evaluation to each employee retained pursuant to this chapter. If the employee’s performance during that 60-day period is satisfactory, the successor contractor or successor subcontractor shall offer the employee continued employment. Any employment after the 60-day transition employment period shall be at-will employment under which the employee may be terminated without cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1062.

(a) An employee, who was not offered employment or who has been discharged in violation of this chapter by a successor contractor or successor subcontractor, or an agent of the employee may bring an action against a successor contractor or successor subcontractor in any superior court of the State of California having jurisdiction over the successor contractor or successor subcontractor. Upon finding a violation of this chapter, the court shall award backpay, including the value of benefits, for each day during which the violation has occurred and continues to occur. The amount of backpay shall be calculated as the greater of either of the following:

(1) The average regular rate of pay received by the employee during the last three years of the employee’s employment in the same occupation classification multiplied by the average hours worked during the last three years of the employee’s employment.

(2) The final regular rate of pay received by the employee at the time of termination of the predecessor contract multiplied by the number of hours usually worked by the employee.

(b) The court may order a preliminary or permanent injunction to stop the continued violation of this chapter.

(c) If the employee is the prevailing party in the legal action, the court shall award the employee reasonable attorney’s fees and costs as part of the costs recoverable.

(d) In the absence of a claim by an employee that he or she was terminated in violation of this chapter, an employee may not maintain a cause of action under this chapter solely for the failure of an employer to provide a written performance evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.

(a) This chapter only applies to contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2002.

(b) Except for the obligations specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1061, nothing in this chapter changes or increases the relationship or duties of a property owner or an awarding authority, or their agents, with respect to contractors, subcontractors, or their employees.

(c) Nothing in this chapter limits the right of a property owner or an awarding authority to terminate a service contract or to replace a contractor with another contractor or with the property owner’s or awarding authority’s own employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1063.5.

(a) This chapter shall apply to every contractor that provides food and beverage services at a publicly owned entertainment venue.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, and in addition to the definitions specified in Section 1060, the following terms shall also have the following meanings:

(1) “Awarding authority” means any person that awards or otherwise enters into contracts for food and beverage services at a publicly owned entertainment venue.

(2) “Contractor” means any person that employs an individual to provide food and beverage services at a publicly owned entertainment
 venue.

(3) “Employee” means any person employed to provide food and beverage services at a publicly owned entertainment venue.

(4) “Publicly owned entertainment venue” means a venue that meets all of the following:

(A) Has been in operation for 15 years or more.

(B) Is located in a zone designated under Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 7070) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(C) Hosts concerts, shows, or sporting events on a noncontinuous basis.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2014, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 39.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a local government agency from enacting ordinances relating to displaced janitors that impose greater standards than, or establish additional enforcement provisions to, those prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1065.

If any provision or provisions of this chapter or any application thereof is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect any other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect notwithstanding that invalidity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 795, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.6. Public Transit Service Contracts and Contracts for the Collection and Transportation of Solid Waste [1070. - 1076.]

1070.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) That when public agencies with jurisdiction over public transit services or the collection and transportation of solid waste award contracts to operate bus and rail services, or to provide for the collection and transportation of solid waste to a new contractor, qualified employees of the prior contractor who are not reemployed by the successor contractor face significant economic dislocation as a result.

(b) That those displaced employees rely unnecessarily upon the unemployment insurance system, public social services, and health programs, increasing
 costs to these vital government programs and placing a significant burden upon both the government and the taxpayers.

(c) That it serves an important social purpose to establish incentives for contractors who bid on public transit service contracts or contracts for the collection and transportation of solid waste to retain qualified employees of the prior contractor to perform the same or similar work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 874, Sec. 2.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1071.

The following definitions apply to this chapter:

(a) “Awarding authority” means any local government agency, including any city, county, special district, transit district, joint powers authority, or nonprofit corporation that awards or otherwise enters into contracts for public transit services or for the collection and transportation of solid waste performed within the State of California.

(b) “Bidder” means any person who submits a bid to an awarding authority for a public transit service contract, an exclusive contract for the collection and transportation of solid waste, or a subcontract.

(c) “Contractor” means any person who enters into a public transit service contract or an exclusive contract for the collection and transportation of solid waste with an awarding authority.

(d) “Employee” means any individual who works for a contractor or subcontractor under a contract. “Employee” does not include an executive, administrative, or professional employee exempt from the payment of overtime compensation within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 515 or any person who is not an “employee” as defined under Section 2(3) of the National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 152(3)).

(e) “Person” means any individual, proprietorship, partnership, joint venture, corporation, limited liability company, trust, association,
 or other entity that may employ individuals or enter into contracts.

(f) “Public transit services” means the provision of passenger transportation services to the general public, including paratransit service.

(g) “Service contract” means any contract the principal purpose of which is to provide public transit services or the exclusive right to provide collection and transportation of solid waste through the use of employees.

(h) “Solid waste” has the same meaning as defined in Section 40191 of the Public Resources Code.

(i) “Subcontractor” means any person who is not an employee who enters into a contract with a contractor to perform a portion of the
 contractor’s express obligations under a service contract. “Subcontractor” does not include a contractor’s vendors, suppliers, insurers, or other service providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 874, Sec. 3.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1072.

(a) A bidder shall declare as part of the bid for a service contract whether or not the bidder will retain the employees of the prior contractor or subcontractor for a period of not less than 90 days, as provided in this chapter, if awarded the service contract.

(b) An awarding authority letting a service contract out to bid shall give a 10-percent preference to any bidder who agrees to retain the employees of the prior contractor or subcontractor pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) If the awarding authority announces that it intends to let a service contract out to bid, the existing service contractor, within a reasonable time, shall provide to the awarding authority the number
 of employees who are performing services under the service contract and the wage rates, benefits, and job classifications of those employees. In addition, the existing service contractor shall make this information available to any entity that the awarding authority has identified as a bona fide bidder. This information shall be made available to each bona fide bidder in writing at least 30 days before bids for the service contract are due, whether by inclusion of the information in the request for bids or otherwise. If the successor service contract is awarded to a new contractor, the existing contractor shall provide the names, addresses, dates of hire, wages, benefit levels, and job classifications of employees to the successor contractor. The duties imposed by this subdivision shall be contained in all service contracts.

(2) A successor contractor or subcontractor who agrees to retain employees pursuant to subdivision (a) shall retain
 employees who have been employed by the prior contractor or subcontractors, except for reasonable and substantiated cause. That cause is limited to the particular employee’s performance or conduct while working under the prior contract or the employee’s failure of any controlled substances and alcohol test, physical examination, criminal background check required by law as a condition of employment, or other standard hiring qualification lawfully required by the successor contractor or subcontractor.

(3) The successor contractor or subcontractor shall make a written offer of employment to each employee to be retained pursuant to subdivision (a). That offer shall state the time within which the employee must accept that offer, but in no case less than 10 days. This section does not require the successor contractor or subcontractor to pay the same wages or offer the same benefits provided by the prior contractor or subcontractor.

(4) If, at any time, the successor contractor or subcontractor determines that fewer employees are required than were required under the prior contract or subcontract, the successor contractor or subcontractor shall retain qualified employees by seniority within the job classification. In determining those employees who are qualified, the successor contractor or subcontractor may require an employee to possess any license that is required by law to operate the equipment that the employee will operate as an employee of the successor contractor or subcontractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 143.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1073.

(a) An employee who was not offered employment or who has been discharged in violation of this chapter, or his or her agent, may bring an action against the successor contractor or subcontractor in any superior court having jurisdiction over the successor contractor or subcontractor. Upon finding a violation of this chapter, the court shall order reinstatement to employment with the successor contractor or subcontractor and award backpay, including the value of benefits, for each day of violation. A violation of this chapter continues for each day that the successor contractor or subcontractor fails to employ the employee, within the period agreed to pursuant to Section 1072.

(b) The court may preliminarily or permanently enjoin the continued violation of this chapter.

(c) If the employee prevails in an action brought under this chapter, the court shall award the employee reasonable attorney’s fees and costs as part of the costs recoverable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 103, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1074.

(a) Upon its own motion or upon the request of any member of the public, an awarding authority may terminate any service contract made pursuant to Section 1072 if both of the following occur:

(1) The contractor or subcontractor has substantially breached the contract.

(2) The awarding authority holds a public hearing within 30 days of the receipt of the request or its announcement of its intention to terminate.

(b) A contractor or subcontractor terminated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be ineligible to bid on or be awarded a service contract or subcontract with that awarding authority for a period of not less than one year and not more than three years, to be determined by the awarding authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 103, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1075.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the following shall apply to service contracts for the collection and transportation of solid waste:

(a) A successor contractor or subcontractor shall be required to retain only employees of a contractor or subcontractor under a prior service contract whose employment would be terminated if the service contract were awarded to another contractor or subcontractor.

(b) A successor contractor or subcontractor shall not be required to retain an employee of a contractor or subcontractor under a prior service contract under any of the following circumstances:

(1) If the employee of the prior contractor or subcontractor does not meet any standard hiring qualification lawfully required by the successor contractor or subcontractor for the position.

(2) If the successor contractor or subcontractor would be required to terminate or reassign an existing employee covered under a collective bargaining agreement with the successor contractor or subcontractor in order to hire the employee of the prior contractor or subcontractor.
